incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="pastor/ok__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovi</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovi</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>koch</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovia</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kami</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kovia</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>koch</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kami</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="člen__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovia</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovia</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pastorok"><i>pastor</i><par n="pastor/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vĺčok"><i>vĺč</i><par n="pastor/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="člen"><i>člen</i><par n="člen__n"/></e>
